Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.134

Liability of county and regional noxious weed control boards.

Obligations or liabilities incurred by any county or regional noxious weed control board or any claims against a county or regional noxious weed control board are governed by chapter 4.96 RCW or RCW 4.08.120: PROVIDED, That individual members or employees of a county noxious weed control board are personally immune from civil liability for damages arising from actions performed within the scope of their official duties or employment.

[ 1997 c 353 s 16; 1987 c 438 s 14.]